Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1232
Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon request of a party, shall be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 7.